Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2881.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-200, to read: START_STATUTE41-200. Attorney general; policies; immigration enforcement; applications, questionnaires and forms; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, Within sixty days after the effective date of this section, the attorney general shall establish policies that may be adopted by state agencies or other governmental entities that limit assistance with immigration ENFORCEMENT and that ensure that the following facilities located in this state remain safe and accessible to all residents of this State, regardless of immigration status: 1. A public school as defined in section 15-101. 2. A community college as defined in section 15-1401. 3. a university under the JURISDICTION of the arizona board of regents. 4. a licensed day care center, preschool program or early learning program in this state that is PUBLICLY funded. 5. A public library. 6. Any facility that is operated by the secretary of state. 7. all Courts in this state. 8. A publicly funded medical treatment center or health care FACILITy, including a hospital, health clinic, emergency or urgent care FACILITy, nursing home, group home for persons with developmental disabilities and mental health FACILITy. B. The policies established by the attorney general pursuant to subsection A of this section AND adopted by state agencies OR other GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES must incorporate protections against unreasonable searches and seizures and REQUIREMENTS for warrants based on probable cause as guaranteed by the constitution of the united states. C. Notwithstanding any other law, if an application, QUESTIONNAIRE or interview FORM that is used in relation to BENEFITS, OPPORTUNITIES or services provided by An agency in this state, A PUBLIC SCHOOL AS DEFINED IN SECTION 15-101, a COMMUNITY COLLEGE AS DEFINED IN SECTION 15-1401 OR A UNIVERSITY UNDER THE JURISDICTION OF THE ARIZONA BOARD OF REGENTS contains any questions regarding citizenship or immigration status, the questions regarding citizenship or immigration status must be removed within sixty days after the effective date of this section. D. For the purposes of this section, "Immigration enforcement" means any efforts to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any civil immigration warrant, detainer request or federal civil immigration law, including any efforts to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's presence in, entry or reentry to, or employment in, the united states. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Short title This act may be cited as the "Immigration Safe Zones Act".